Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to  the Department of Corrections, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services ............................. $ 1,732,573,909
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services ............................. $ 313,637,712
(3) Correctional services ........ $ 129,224,310
(4) Community corrections .... $ 315,978,439
(5) Debt service ...................... $ 90,435,441
(6) Capital improvements ....... $ 3,320,124
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Cor-
rections, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services ............................. $ 26,197,064
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services ............................. $ 20,415,033
(3) Correctional services ........ $ 4,024,996
(4) Community corrections .... $ 1,731,848
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,167,665 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Cor-
rections.
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 2